Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2756.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 363A.03, subdivision 48, is amended to read: Subd. 48. Unfair discriminatory practice. "Unfair discriminatory practice" means any act described in sections 363A.08 to deleted text begin 363A.19deleted text end new text begin 363A.195new text end and 363A.28, subdivision 10. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [363A.195] DISABILITY DISCRIMINATION PROHIBITED IN PROGRAMS RECEIVING STATE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE. new text end new text begin (a) It is an unfair discriminatory practice for a program or activity receiving state financial assistance to exclude a qualified disabled person from participation in the program or activity, deny a qualified disabled person the full and equal enjoyment of any benefits, or otherwise discriminate against a qualified disabled person because of a disability. new text end new text begin (b) Each state agency that provides financial assistance to a program or activity shall ensure that the recipient of financial assistance complies with the requirements of this section and shall adopt rules as necessary to enforce compliance with this section. new text end new text begin (c) The provisions of this section shall remain in full force and effect regardless of any modification, repeal, or reduction in federal disability rights statutes, including but not limited to section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, Code of Federal Regulations, title 29, section 701, et seq. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end